California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The commissioners first appointed shall so classify themselves by lot, that one member holds office for one year, one for two years, one for three years, and two for four years, thereafter appointments shall be for a four-year term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8132.

Each commissioner shall serve until the appointment and qualification of his successor. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8133.

Within twenty days after their appointment, the commissioners shall meet and elect one member president, one member vice-president, and one member secretary. The terms of office of officers shall be one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8134.

The commission is authorized to pay each commissioner an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each meeting of the commission attended by the commissioner, not exceeding two meetings during any one calendar month, together with expenses necessarily incurred by the commissioner in traveling between his or her place of residence and the place of meeting, and while traveling in connection with the business of the commission, when previously authorized by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [8145. - 8145.]

8145.

The commission has all of the following powers:

(a) To sue and be sued in its own name.

(b) To adopt a seal.

(c) To lay out, establish, construct, and maintain projects for separation of grade by underpass, overpass, or tunnel, or any combination thereof, over or under one or more city streets, county roads or highways, state highways, railroads, street railroads, or other intersecting means of transportation, or any combination thereof, within the district and, for this purpose, to acquire by purchase, gift, devise, condemnation, or otherwise, and pay for and hold real and personal property and rights of way within the district. As to any project that would involve a state highway, the commission shall obtain the approval of the department as to the plans, and the project shall be constructed pursuant to an agreement between the commission and the department, as may be provided in the agreement. As to any project that would involve a railroad or street railroad, the district shall be governed by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1201) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code and by any other applicable provisions of law; and for the purposes and within the meaning of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1201) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, and for those purposes and meaning only, a “separation-of-grade district” is a “political subdivision” and the “commission” of a separation-of-grade district is the “legislative body” of a political subdivision. For the purposes of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2450) of Division 3, a separation-of-grade district is a “local agency” and the commission of a separation-of-grade district is the “legislative body” of a local agency.

(d) To enter into an agreement with any city or county to provide for the relocation, redesign, or improvement of any street in the city or county directly affected by, or that is an integral part of, a separation-of-grade project. The district may expend funds pursuant to such an agreement.

(e) To remove an obstacle to traffic flow that otherwise would require constructing a separation of grade.

(f) To exercise the power of eminent domain to the full extent necessary to carry out this part.

(g) To make and accept all contracts, deeds, releases, and documents of any kind that are necessary or proper to the exercise of any of the powers of the district.

(h) To direct the payment of all lawful claims and demands against the district.

(i) To levy and collect taxes as provided.

(j) To borrow for the purpose of defraying general administrative and preliminary engineering expenses of the district prior to the time the money to be raised by the first tax levy for the district will be available, and to evidence that borrowing by nonnegotiable notes bearing interest at a rate to be fixed by the commission. The notes shall be signed by the president, and countersigned by the secretary, of the commission. The notes shall be payable from the first tax levy made by the district, and that tax levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the payment of the notes and the interest on those notes.

(k) To issue bonds as provided and to provide for their payment.

(l) To employ all necessary engineers, surveyors, agents, and workers to do the work on, or in connection with, the project or projects in the district, and to contract for engineering services with any city within the district or with the county.

(m) To do any and all things necessary or proper for the complete exercise of its powers and the accomplishment of the purpose for which it was formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 137, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Preliminary Plans and Surveys [8160. - 8161.]

8160.

Before the construction of any project, and before the calling of any election for the issuance of bonds, the commission shall employ one or more engineers, or contract for engineering services with any city within the district or with the county, who shall make all necessary surveys, and prepare maps showing the location, cross-section and profile of the proposed project. The engineer shall also prepare specifications for the construction of the project and estimates of the cost of construction and of acquiring rights of way. These surveys, maps, specifications and estimates shall, upon approval by the commission, be promptly adopted by order entered upon the minutes and filed with its secretary, and when so adopted shall constitute the plan of the district for the proposed project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 298.)
-------------------------------------------

8161.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 8117, upon the completion of the surveys referred to in Section 8160 and upon recommendation of the engineer or engineers, in which recommendation shall be included the estimate of cost of each proposed improvement, the commission by resolution duly adopted and recorded in its minutes may approve any changes in the location or locations of the projects described by the board of supervisors in its resolution of intention to form the district, as to the commission may appear reasonable and proper under the circumstances. The said resolution shall set forth the reasons for such changes or additions and the cost of each project as recommended in the engineer’s report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Approval of Construction Plans [8190. - 8195.]

8190.

At any time after the adoption of a plan for a project or the letting of a contract for the construction of the whole or any portion of the project, the commission may, by order entered in its minutes, call an election for the purpose of determining whether bonds should be issued for the acquisition of rights of way for and the construction of such project and for the payment of such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8191.

The order shall fix the day of the election, shall describe the exact location of each project for which bonds are to be issued, shall specify the amount of the bond issue for each project, and shall state in general terms that the money raised from the sale of the bonds for each project shall be used only for the acquisition of rights-of-way for and the construction of, the project for which bonds shall have been issued. If the election is called for the payment of a contract entered into by the commission the order shall state the terms of the contract in such manner as will advise the electors of its contents. Any money raised by means of a bond issue which remains on hand after the acquisition of rights-of-way and construction have been completed, shall be expended in the betterment and maintenance of the project for which the bonds have been voted or for payment on the principal of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

8192.

Notice of the election shall be given in the manner and for the time provided for in Section 8123. The election shall be held and conducted in the same manner as provided for holding and conducting an election for approval of the formation of the district, except that the commission shall perform the duties prescribed for the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8192.5.

On the ballot at the election each project shall be submitted as a separate proposition, together with a description of the exact location of the project and a statement of the amount of bonds to be issued for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8193.

After the vote has been counted and the result announced by the election officers, the ballots shall be sealed up and delivered to the secretary of the commission, with the election returns. The commission shall at its next meeting canvass the returns and enter the result upon its minutes. This entry in the minutes is conclusive evidence of the fact and regularity of all prior proceedings required by this part and of the facts stated in the entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8194.

If at the election two-thirds, or more, of the votes cast on a proposition are in favor of the issuance of bonds for the project described in the proposition for which bonds are proposed to be issued, the commission is authorized to and shall issue and sell the bonds as proposed in the order calling the election for such project. If the result of the election is against the issuance of bonds for any or all projects, no other election upon the same project or projects defeated in such election shall be called or held for one year after such election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8195.

A project may be constructed with money raised by taxation instead of a bond issue if authorized by two-thirds, or more, of the votes cast at an election called for the purpose of determining if the project shall be so constructed. Elections called to authorize the construction of projects with money raised by taxation shall be called and held in the same manner as is provided for bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. The Bond Issue [8205. - 8210.]

8205.

All bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the commission may determine, except that they shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8206.

All bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the county treasurer of the county, and shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed 6 percent per annum, which shall be payable semiannually. Not less than one-thirtieth part of the total issue of bonds shall be payable each year, commencing not more than five years after the date of the bond issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8207.

The bonds shall be signed by the president and countersigned by the secretary of the commission. They shall be numbered consecutively in the order of their maturity, and shall have coupons attached attested by the facsimile signature of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8208.

The bonds may be sold by the commission in such manner and such quantities as it may determine, but no bond shall be sold for less than its face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8209.

The proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be deposited with the county treasurer and shall be placed by him in a fund in the county treasury to be called the ____ Separation of Grade District Fund (naming it). The money in the fund shall be used for the purposes indicated in the order calling the election at which the issuance of the bonds was authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8210.

The bonds shall be legal investment: for all trust funds; the funds of all insurance companies, banks, and trust companies; the state school funds, and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer; and whenever any moneys may by law now or hereafter enacted be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds of states, counties or school districts in the State, such moneys may be invested or loaned on the security of the bonds of such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Levy and Collection of Taxes [8220. - 8223.]

8220.

Annually on or before August 1st, the commission shall furnish to the board of supervisors and auditor of the county an estimate in writing of the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation for the purposes of the district for the ensuing fiscal year. The amount shall be sufficient to pay:

(a) The interest on all outstanding bonds of the district which will become due during the ensuing fiscal year.

(b) The principal of all outstanding bonds of the district which will mature during the ensuing fiscal year.

(c) The amount necessary to pay the contract price of any contract which was to be paid by a tax levied on the real property within the district as herein provided.

(d) The estimated cost of repairs and maintenance of the project and the running expenses of the district.

(e) The amount necessary for preliminary engineering and other expenses incurred prior to the issuance and sale of bonds.

(f) In the first tax levy, the amount, if any, required to be raised to pay principal of or interest on any notes issued by the district as authorized herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

8221.

Annually at the time of levying county taxes, the board of supervisors shall levy a tax upon the real property within the district. The rate shall be such as will produce, after due allowance for delinquency, the amount determined as necessary to be raised by taxation on the secured roll. The tax rate so levied shall apply to the real property within the district as it appears on the assessment roll of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

8222.

The tax so levied shall be computed and entered on the assessment roll by the county auditor, and if the board fails to levy the tax the auditor shall do so. The tax shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes, and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district. The provisions of law prescribing the manner of levying and collecting county taxes and the duties of the several county officers with respect to taxation are, so far as they are not in conflict with this chapter, applicable to taxation under this chapter. Such officers shall be liable upon their several official bonds for the faithful discharge of the duties imposed upon them by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8223.

All money raised by taxation which is authorized by this chapter shall belong to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Claims [8230. - 8230.]

8230.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. District Funds [8235. - 8236.]

8235.

The treasury of the county in which the district is situated shall be the depository for the funds of the district. The county treasurer shall receive and receipt for the funds of the district, and shall place all such funds to the credit of the district. He shall be responsible upon his official bond for their safekeeping and proper disbursement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8236.

The following funds are hereby established in the county treasury to which the money belonging to the district and raised by taxation shall be apportioned by the treasurer:

(a) Bond fund.

(b) Construction and maintenance fund.

(c) District expense fund.

The treasurer shall pay out district funds only upon warrants of the commission signed by the president and attested by the secretary, except that all bonds and coupons shall be paid on presentation by the county treasurer out of the bond fund without warrant. Upon request of the commission or its secretary the treasurer shall report in writing to the commission the amount of money in the various funds, the amount of receipts since his last report, and the amounts paid out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Transfer of Projects [8237. - 8237.]

8237.

After any project has been completely constructed the commission may at its option convey all the right, title and interest of the district in and to that project to the city in which the project was constructed or county if the project is in an unincorporated area; provided, the governing body of the city or county consents to and accepts the conveyance, and agrees to maintain the project. All projects so conveyed shall be held by the city or county without any further liability or responsibility on the part of the district. No such conveyance shall affect the liability of the district for any bonds previously issued by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 298.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Dissolution [8250. - 8252.]

8250.

Whenever it shall deem it advisable, the commission shall, by resolution, order that an election be held in the district upon the question of dissolution of the district. The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as other elections of the district, and if at the election, two-thirds, or more, of the votes cast are in favor of the dissolution, the district shall be dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8251.

Upon dissolution of a district containing a single city, any property which may have been acquired by the district shall vest in the city, except projects theretofore transferred and conveyed to the county under the provisions of Chapter 11 of this part.

Upon dissolution of a district containing two or more cities, undisposed of property shall be distributed by the commission to the cities by a formula based on the assessed valuation of property contained in the cities as shown on the last equalized assessment roll of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 298.)
-------------------------------------------

8252.

If at the time of the election to dissolve the district there is outstanding any bonded indebtedness of the district, the vote to dissolve shall dissolve the district for all purposes except the levy and collection of taxes for the payment of that outstanding indebtedness. From the time of dissolution until the bonded indebtedness, together with interest thereon, is fully paid, the board shall constitute ex officio the commission and shall levy such taxes and perform such other acts as may be necessary to raise the money for the payment of the outstanding indebtedness of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Determination of Legality of District [8265. - 8269.]

8265.

Any district, in order to determine the legality of its existence, may institute a proceeding in the superior court of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8266.

The proceeding is instituted by filing with the clerk of the court a complaint setting forth:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) Its exterior boundaries.

(c) The date of its organization.

(d) A prayer that the district be judged legally formed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 591.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8267.

The summons shall be addressed generally to all persons interested in the district, or in any of the lands contained in the district, and shall be served by publishing a copy once a week for four weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8268.

Within 30 days after the last publication of summons, any person interested may appear and answer the complaint. The answer shall set forth the facts relied upon to show the invalidity of the district. If no answer is filed within the time allowed the court shall render judgment as prayed for in the complaint. If an answer is filed the court shall proceed as in other civil cases. The proceeding is in rem and the judgment rendered is conclusive against all persons who could have appeared in the action and against the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

8269.

If any provision of this part is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portion of this part. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed each provision of this part irrespective of the fact that any one or more such provisions be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Annexation of Territory [8275. - 8282.]

8275.

At any time after the formation of a district the board may determine that contiguous territory should be annexed to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.

The board shall fix a time and place for hearing of the matter of annexation and shall direct its clerk to publish a notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in any newspaper circulated in the county which the board deems most likely to give notice to the landowners of the territory proposed to be annexed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

8277.

The notice shall contain a description of the territory proposed to be annexed and the time and place at which objections to the annexation will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

8278.

At the time and place of hearing, or at any time to which it is continued, the board shall consider any objections which may be filed against the annexation of any territory to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

8279.

After the hearing the board may refuse to annex any territory to the district or it may include all or a portion of the territory proposed to be annexed. If the board determines to annex any territory it shall by order entered on its minutes alter the boundaries of the district and annex thereto all or such portion of the territory as will be benefited by inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

8280.

Any territory which will not be benefited by inclusion in the district shall not be included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

8281.

The order of annexation shall be conclusive evidence of the validity of all prior proceedings leading to the annexation recited therein and upon the making of the order, the territory shall become a part of the district and shall be taxed, together with the remainder of the district, for all taxes thereafter levied by the board for the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------

8282.

The procedure prescribed in this part shall be the exclusive method of formation of such district and of annexation of territory to a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1230.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Annexation of Territory Annexed to or Included in a City [8290. - 8297.]

8290.

Subject to the provisions of Chapter 8 of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code, the unincorporated territory of a county which was not included within a district at the time of the formation of such district, and which subsequent to the formation of such district is annexed to or otherwise included within a city which is a part of such district, shall immediately upon such annexation to such city be included within the district and shall thereafter become a part of the district to the same extent as such city; except such portion or portions thereof which the city council has determined, in proceedings under this chapter, will not be benefited by inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8291.

Prior to the completion of proceedings for the annexation or inclusion of unincorporated territories to or within a city which is a part of a separation of grade district the city council shall adopt a resolution containing the following:

(a) A description of the unincorporated territory involved in the annexation or inclusion proceedings.

(b) A statement that unless excluded by the city council all portions of such unincorporated territory shall upon annexation to or inclusion within the city be included within the district, and naming the district.

(c) A statement of the time and place at which objections to inclusion within the district will be heard, which time shall not be less than 30 days after the adoption of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8292.

The resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the territory proposed to be annexed or included. The first publication shall be at least 20 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

8293.

The hearing may be continued from time to time and from place to place for not exceeding a total of 60 days by public declaration thereof, and no other notice of the fact of such continuance need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8294.

At the hearing, the city council shall hear all relevant and pertinent objections to inclusion of any portion or portions of the territory within the district and may, in its discretion, hear arguments against the objections urged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8295.

At the hearing, or within 20 days after the adjournment thereof, the city council shall by resolution determine what, if any, portion or portions of the territory should not be included within the district because not benefited by such inclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8296.

Upon the completion of the annexation or inclusion of the unincorporated territory described in Section 8290 to a city, the clerk of the legislative body of such city shall so notify the secretary of the commission of the district and shall furnish such secretary with a certified copy of the ordinance or resolution adopted by the legislative body of such city annexing or including said territory to such city and of the resolution determining what portion or portions of the territory should not be included in the district because not benefited by such inclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

8297.

Upon receipt of the certified copy of the resolution or ordinance, and resolution, referred to in Section 8296, the secretary of the commission of the district shall file a statement of the change of the district boundaries which has resulted from said annexation of unincorporated territory to a city together with a map or plat indicating the boundaries of the district as so changed with the assessor of the county in which the district is located and with the State Board of Equalization pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 8, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. PUBLIC STREETS, HIGHWAYS, AND SERVICE EASEMENTS VACATION LAW [8300. - 8363.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title and Definitions [8300. - 8309.]

8300.

This part may be cited as the Public Streets, Highways, and Service Easements Vacation Law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8301.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8302.

“Adoption” of a resolution includes passage or enactment of a resolution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8303.

“Clerk” includes a person or officer who is the clerk of a legislative body.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8304.

“Legislative body” means:

(a) In the case of a county or city and county, the board of supervisors.

(b) In the case of a city, the city council or other body which, by law, is the legislative body of the government of the city.

(c) In the case of the California Transportation Commission, the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8305.

“Local agency” means a county, city, or city and county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8305.5.

“Public entity” means a local agency or the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8306.

“Public service easement” includes all or part of, or any right in:

(a) A right-of-way, easement, or use restriction acquired for public use by dedication or otherwise for sewers, pipelines, polelines, electrical transmission and communication lines, pathways, storm drains, drainage, canal, water transmission lines, light and air, and other limited use public easements other than for street or highway purposes.

(b) An easement or right of a type described in Section 8340.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8306.5.

“Public utility” means a public utility as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8307.

“Resolution” includes an ordinance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8308.

“Street” and “highway” include all or part of, or any right in, a state highway or other public highway, road, street, avenue, alley, lane, driveway, place, court, trail, or other public right-of-way or easement, or purported public street or highway, and rights connected therewith, including, but not limited to, restrictions of access or abutters’ rights, sloping easements, or other incidents to a street or highway.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8309.

“Vacation” means the complete or partial abandonment or termination of the public right to use a street, highway, or public service easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [8310. - 8317.]

8310.

This part shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8311.

(a) The procedures provided in this part are alternative procedures for vacating streets, highways, and public service easements. The authority granted in this part is an alternative to any other authority provided by law to public entities.

(b) The provisions of this part shall not apply to or affect any other provision of this code. If proceedings are commenced under this part, the provisions of this part, and no other provisions of this code, shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8312.

Except as provided in Section 8315, a city legislative body may vacate, pursuant to this part, all or part of a street, highway, or public service easement within the city and a board of supervisors may vacate all or part of a street, highway, or public service easement within the county but outside a city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8313.

(a) If the proposed vacation of a street, highway, or public service easement is within an area for which a general plan is adopted by a local agency, the legislative body of the public entity shall consider the general plan prior to vacating the street, highway, or public service easement.

(b) The procedure prescribed in Section 65402 of the Government Code shall be followed if that section applies to the proposed vacation. If Section 65402 of the Government Code does not apply to the proposed vacation, the legislative body may submit the proposed vacation to the local planning commission or planning agency and give the commission or agency an opportunity to report upon the proposed vacation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 982, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

8314.

Section 892 applies to a street, highway, or public service easement vacated pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8315.

A state highway may be vacated under this part only by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8316.

One or more streets, highways, and public service easements, whether or not contiguous, may be included and vacated in the same proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

8317.

(a) Proof of publication of a notice shall be made by affidavit pursuant to the Code of Civil Procedure. Proof of the posting of a notice shall be made by affidavit of the person posting it, reciting the facts of the posting.

(b) An officer required to have any notice published or posted shall file the affidavit in his or her office. Failure to do so does not invalidate proceedings under this part. An affidavit so filed is prima facie evidence of the facts stated in it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1050, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Vacation Procedure [8320. - 8325.]

8320.

(a) The legislative body of a local agency may initiate a proceeding under this chapter in either of the following ways:

(1) On its own initiative, where the clerk of the legislative body shall administratively set a hearing by fixing the date, hour, and place of the hearing and cause the publishing and posting of the notices required by this chapter.

(2) Upon a petition or request of an interested person, at the discretion of the legislative body, except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 8321, where the clerk of the legislative body shall administratively set a hearing by fixing the date, hour, and place of the hearing and cause the publishing and posting of the notices required by this chapter.

(b) The notices required by this chapter shall contain both of the following:

(1) A description of the street, highway, or public service easement proposed to be vacated and a reference to a map or plan, that shows the portion or area to be vacated and includes a statement that the vacation proceeding is conducted under this chapter. In the case of a street or highway, the description shall include its general location, its lawful or official name or the name by which it is commonly known, and the extent to which it is to be vacated. In the case of a public service easement, the description shall identify it with common certainty. The map or plan showing the location of the street, highway, or public easement proposed to be vacated is sufficient compliance with this paragraph.

(2) The date, hour, and place for hearing all persons interested in the proposed vacation. The date shall not be less than 15 days after the initiation of proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 876, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8321.

(a) Ten or more freeholders may petition the board of supervisors to vacate a street or highway under this chapter. At least two of the petitioners shall be residents of the road district in which some part of the street or highway proposed to be vacated is situated and shall be taxable therein for street or highway purposes.

(b) Five or more freeholders may petition the board of supervisors to vacate a public service easement under this chapter. At least one of the petitioners shall be a resident of the township in which the public service easement proposed to be vacated is situated.

(c) The residence address of each petitioner shall be set forth in the petition.

(d) The board of supervisors may require the payment of a fee for filing a petition to defray the expenses of investigations, mailings, publications, and postings under this chapter.

(e) Upon the filing of a petition and the making of the deposit, if any, required under this section, the board of supervisors, by order, shall fix the date, hour, and place of the hearing on the petition. At least two weeks before the day set for the hearing, the clerk of the board shall mail a notice of the date, hour, and place of the hearing to each of the petitioners at the address set forth in the petition.
